Hawaii statutes.
§664-8 Appeal. Any party aggrieved by
the decision of the commissioner of boundaries may appeal therefrom to the
intermediate appellate court, subject to chapter 602, within thirty days from
the rendition of the decision, and within the period shall pay all costs
accrued and shall pay or deposit costs for appeal as provided in sections
607-5, 607-6, and 607-7; provided that any land owner absent from the State and
not represented by an authorized agent within the State shall have the right of
appeal for one year from the rendition of the decision. [L 1894-5, c 14, §4; RL
1925, §559; RL 1935, §3667; am L 1939, c 19, §4; RL 1945, §10208; RL 1955,
§234-8; HRS §664-8; am L 1974, c 145, §9; am L 1979, c 111, §27(1); gen ch
1985; am L 2004, c 202, §74; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Rules of Court

See Hawaii Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Case Notes

By government if aggrieved. 20 H. 278 (1910).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next